Arkansas, session 2025, SB469.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-201(6)(D), concerning the definition of
a county political party committee and resulting from Initiated Act 1 of
1996, is amended to read as follows:
(D) Does not accept any contribution or cumulative
contributions in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) from any person in any calendar year; and

/s/C. Penzo







*SSS244*
03-31-2025 14:26:46 SSS244